Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5219.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature recognizes that partial confinement programs play a critical role in rehabilitation and the reduction of recidivism. The legislature finds that different partial confinement programs can meet the rehabilitative needs of different individuals. The legislature finds that aligning participation timelines for programs will allow incarcerated individuals to engage in the program best suited for their individual circumstances.Sec. 2. RCW 9.94A.030 and 2022 c 231 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.(1) "Board" means the indeterminate sentence review board created under chapter 9.95 RCW.(2) "Collect," or any derivative thereof, "collect and remit," or "collect and deliver," when used with reference to the department, means that the department, either directly or through a collection agreement authorized by RCW 9.94A.760, is responsible for monitoring and enforcing the offender's sentence with regard to the legal financial obligation, receiving payment thereof from the offender, and, consistent with current law, delivering daily the entire payment to the superior court clerk without depositing it in a departmental account.(3) "Commission" means the sentencing guidelines commission.(4) "Community corrections officer" means an employee of the department who is responsible for carrying out specific duties in supervision of sentenced offenders and monitoring of sentence conditions.(5) "Community custody" means that portion of an offender's sentence of confinement in lieu of earned release time or imposed as part of a sentence under this chapter and served in the community subject to controls placed on the offender's movement and activities by the department.(6) "Community protection zone" means the area within 880 feet of the facilities and grounds of a public or private school.(7) "Community restitution" means compulsory service, without compensation, performed for the benefit of the community by the offender.(8) "Confinement" means total or partial confinement.(9) "Conviction" means an adjudication of guilt pursuant to Title 10 or 13 RCW and includes a verdict of guilty, a finding of guilty, and acceptance of a plea of guilty.(10) "Crime-related prohibition" means an order of a court prohibiting conduct that directly relates to the circumstances of the crime for which the offender has been convicted, and shall not be construed to mean orders directing an offender affirmatively to participate in rehabilitative programs or to otherwise perform affirmative conduct. However, affirmative acts necessary to monitor compliance with the order of a court may be required by the department.(11) "Criminal history" means the list of a defendant's prior convictions and juvenile adjudications, whether in this state, in federal court, or elsewhere, and any issued certificates of restoration of opportunity pursuant to RCW 9.97.020.(a) The history shall include, where known, for each conviction (i) whether the defendant has been placed on probation and the length and terms thereof; and (ii) whether the defendant has been incarcerated and the length of incarceration.(b) A conviction may be removed from a defendant's criminal history only if it is vacated pursuant to RCW 9.96.060, 9.94A.640, 9.95.240, or a similar out-of-state statute, or if the conviction has been vacated pursuant to a governor's pardon. However, when a defendant is charged with a recidivist offense, "criminal history" includes a vacated prior conviction for the sole purpose of establishing that such vacated prior conviction constitutes an element of the present recidivist offense as provided in RCW 9.94A.640(4)(b) and 9.96.060(((7)))(8)(c).(c) The determination of a defendant's criminal history is distinct from the determination of an offender score. A prior conviction that was not included in an offender score calculated pursuant to a former version of the sentencing reform act remains part of the defendant's criminal history.(12) "Criminal street gang" means any ongoing organization, association, or group of three or more persons, whether formal or informal, having a common name or common identifying sign or symbol, having as one of its primary activities the commission of criminal acts, and whose members or associates individually or collectively engage in or have engaged in a pattern of criminal street gang activity. This definition does not apply to employees engaged in concerted activities for their mutual aid and protection, or to the activities of labor and bona fide nonprofit organizations or their members or agents.(13) "Criminal street gang associate or member" means any person who actively participates in any criminal street gang and who intentionally promotes, furthers, or assists in any criminal act by the criminal street gang.(14) "Criminal street gang-related offense" means any felony or misdemeanor offense, whether in this state or elsewhere, that is committed for the benefit of, at the direction of, or in association with any criminal street gang, or is committed with the intent to promote, further, or assist in any criminal conduct by the gang, or is committed for one or more of the following reasons:(a) To gain admission, prestige, or promotion within the gang;(b) To increase or maintain the gang's size, membership, prestige, dominance, or control in any geographical area;(c) To exact revenge or retribution for the gang or any member of the gang;(d) To obstruct justice, or intimidate or eliminate any witness against the gang or any member of the gang;(e) To directly or indirectly cause any benefit, aggrandizement, gain, profit, or other advantage for the gang, its reputation, influence, or membership; or(f) To provide the gang with any advantage in, or any control or dominance over any criminal market sector, including, but not limited to, manufacturing, delivering, or selling any controlled substance (chapter 69.50 RCW); arson (chapter 9A.48 RCW); trafficking in stolen property (chapter 9A.82 RCW); promoting prostitution (chapter 9A.88 RCW); human trafficking (RCW 9A.40.100); promoting commercial sexual abuse of a minor (RCW 9.68A.101); or promoting pornography (chapter 9.68 RCW).(15) "Day fine" means a fine imposed by the sentencing court that equals the difference between the offender's net daily income and the reasonable obligations that the offender has for the support of the offender and any dependents.(16) "Day reporting" means a program of enhanced supervision designed to monitor the offender's daily activities and compliance with sentence conditions, and in which the offender is required to report daily to a specific location designated by the department or the sentencing court.(17) "Department" means the department of corrections.(18) "Determinate sentence" means a sentence that states with exactitude the number of actual years, months, or days of total confinement, of partial confinement, of community custody, the number of actual hours or days of community restitution work, or dollars or terms of a legal financial obligation. The fact that an offender through earned release can reduce the actual period of confinement shall not affect the classification of the sentence as a determinate sentence.(19) "Disposable earnings" means that part of the earnings of an offender remaining after the deduction from those earnings of any amount required by law to be withheld. For the purposes of this definition, "earnings" means compensation paid or payable for personal services, whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, bonuses, or otherwise, and, notwithstanding any other provision of law making the payments exempt from garnishment, attachment, or other process to satisfy a court-ordered legal financial obligation, specifically includes periodic payments pursuant to pension or retirement programs, or insurance policies of any type, but does not include payments made under Title 50 RCW, except as provided in RCW 50.40.020 and 50.40.050, or Title 74 RCW.(20)(a) "Domestic violence" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 10.99.020.(b) "Domestic violence" also means: (i) Physical harm, bodily injury, assault, or the infliction of fear of imminent physical harm, bodily injury, or assault, sexual assault, or stalking, as defined in RCW 9A.46.110, of one intimate partner by another intimate partner as defined in RCW 10.99.020; or (ii) physical harm, bodily injury, assault, or the infliction of fear of imminent physical harm, bodily injury, or assault, sexual assault, or stalking, as defined in RCW 9A.46.110, of one family or household member by another family or household member as defined in RCW 10.99.020.(21) "Drug offender sentencing alternative" is a sentencing option available to persons convicted of a felony offense who are eligible for the option under RCW 9.94A.660.(22) "Drug offense" means:(a) Any felony violation of chapter 69.50 RCW except possession of a controlled substance (RCW 69.50.4013) or forged prescription for a controlled substance (RCW 69.50.403);(b) Any offense defined as a felony under federal law that relates to the possession, manufacture, distribution, or transportation of a controlled substance; or(c) Any out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a drug offense under (a) of this subsection.(23) "Earned release" means earned release from confinement as provided in RCW 9.94A.728.(24) "Electronic monitoring" means tracking the location of an individual through the use of technology that is capable of determining or identifying the monitored individual's presence or absence at a particular location including, but not limited to:(a) Radio frequency signaling technology, which detects if the monitored individual is or is not at an approved location and notifies the monitoring agency of the time that the monitored individual either leaves the approved location or tampers with or removes the monitoring device; or(b) Active or passive global positioning system technology, which detects the location of the monitored individual and notifies the monitoring agency of the monitored individual's location and which may also include electronic monitoring with victim notification technology that is capable of notifying a victim or protected party, either directly or through a monitoring agency, if the monitored individual enters within the restricted distance of a victim or protected party, or within the restricted distance of a designated location.(25) "Escape" means:(a) Sexually violent predator escape (RCW 9A.76.115), escape in the first degree (RCW 9A.76.110), escape in the second degree (RCW 9A.76.120), willful failure to return from furlough (RCW 72.66.060), willful failure to return from work release (RCW 72.65.070), or willful failure to be available for supervision by the department while in community custody (RCW 72.09.310); or(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as an escape under (a) of this subsection.(26) "Felony traffic offense" means:(a) Vehicular homicide (RCW 46.61.520), vehicular assault (RCW 46.61.522), eluding a police officer (RCW 46.61.024), felony hit-and-run injury-accident (RCW 46.52.020(4)), felony driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502(6)), or felony physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.504(6)); or(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a felony traffic offense under (a) of this subsection.(27) "Fine" means a specific sum of money ordered by the sentencing court to be paid by the offender to the court over a specific period of time.(28) "First-time offender" means any person who has no prior convictions for a felony and is eligible for the first-time offender waiver under RCW 9.94A.650.(29) "Home detention" is a subset of electronic monitoring and means a program of partial confinement available to offenders wherein the offender is confined in a private residence 24 hours a day, unless an absence from the residence is approved, authorized, or otherwise permitted in the order by the court or other supervising agency that ordered home detention, and the offender is subject to electronic monitoring.(30) "Homelessness" or "homeless" means a condition where an individual lacks a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence and who has a primary nighttime residence that is:(a) A supervised, publicly or privately operated shelter designed to provide temporary living accommodations;(b) A public or private place not designed for, or ordinarily used as, a regular sleeping accommodation for human beings; or(c) A private residence where the individual stays as a transient invitee.(31) "Legal financial obligation" means a sum of money that is ordered by a superior court of the state of Washington for legal financial obligations which may include restitution to the victim, statutorily imposed crime victims' compensation fees as assessed pursuant to RCW 7.68.035, court costs, county or interlocal drug funds, court-appointed attorneys' fees, and costs of defense, fines, and any other financial obligation that is assessed to the offender as a result of a felony conviction. Upon conviction for vehicular assault while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.522(1)(b), or vehicular homicide while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.520(1)(a), legal financial obligations may also include payment to a public agency of the expense of an emergency response to the incident resulting in the conviction, subject to RCW 38.52.430.(32) "Most serious offense" means any of the following felonies or a felony attempt to commit any of the following felonies:(a) Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a class A felony;(b) Assault in the second degree;(c) Assault of a child in the second degree;(d) Child molestation in the second degree;(e) Controlled substance homicide;(f) Extortion in the first degree;(g) Incest when committed against a child under age 14;(h) Indecent liberties;(i) Kidnapping in the second degree;(j) Leading organized crime;(k) Manslaughter in the first degree;(l) Manslaughter in the second degree;(m) Promoting prostitution in the first degree;(n) Rape in the third degree;(o) Sexual exploitation;(p) Vehicular assault, when caused by the operation or driving of a vehicle by a person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless manner;(q) Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of any vehicle by any person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner;(r) Any other class B felony offense with a finding of sexual motivation;(s) Any other felony with a deadly weapon verdict under RCW 9.94A.825;(t) Any felony offense in effect at any time prior to December 2, 1993, that is comparable to a most serious offense under this subsection, or any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a most serious offense under this subsection;(u)(i) A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (c), chapter 260, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess. as it existed until July 1, 1979, RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (c) as it existed from July 1, 1979, until June 11, 1986, and RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (d) as it existed from June 11, 1986, until July 1, 1988;(ii) A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW 9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from June 11, 1986, until July 1, 1988, if: (A) The crime was committed against a child under the age of 14; or (B) the relationship between the victim and perpetrator is included in the definition of indecent liberties under RCW 9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from July 1, 1988, through July 27, 1997, or RCW 9A.44.100(1) (d) or (e) as it existed from July 25, 1993, through July 27, 1997;(v) Any out-of-state conviction for a felony offense with a finding of sexual motivation if the minimum sentence imposed was 10 years or more; provided that the out-of-state felony offense must be comparable to a felony offense under this title and Title 9A RCW and the out-of-state definition of sexual motivation must be comparable to the definition of sexual motivation contained in this section.(33) "Nonviolent offense" means an offense which is not a violent offense.(34) "Offender" means a person who has committed a felony established by state law and is 18 years of age or older or is less than 18 years of age but whose case is under superior court jurisdiction under RCW 13.04.030 or has been transferred by the appropriate juvenile court to a criminal court pursuant to RCW 13.40.110. In addition, for the purpose of community custody requirements under this chapter, "offender" also means a misdemeanant or gross misdemeanant probationer ordered by a superior court to probation pursuant to RCW 9.92.060, 9.95.204, or 9.95.210 and supervised by the department pursuant to RCW 9.94A.501 and 9.94A.5011. Throughout this chapter, the terms "offender" and "defendant" are used interchangeably.(35) "Partial confinement" means confinement ((for no more than one year))up to 18 months in a facility or institution operated or utilized under contract by the state or any other unit of government, or, if home detention, electronic monitoring, or work crew has been ordered by the court or home detention has been ordered by the department as part of the parenting program or the graduated reentry program, in an approved residence, for a substantial portion of each day with the balance of the day spent in the community. Partial confinement includes work release, home detention, work crew, electronic monitoring, and a combination of work crew, electronic monitoring, and home detention.(36) "Pattern of criminal street gang activity" means:(a) The commission, attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation of, or any prior juvenile adjudication of or adult conviction of, two or more of the following criminal street gang-related offenses:(i) Any "serious violent" felony offense as defined in this section, excluding Homicide by Abuse (RCW 9A.32.055) and Assault of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120);(ii) Any "violent" offense as defined by this section, excluding Assault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130);(iii) Deliver or Possession with Intent to Deliver a Controlled Substance (chapter 69.50 RCW);(iv) Any violation of the firearms and dangerous weapon act (chapter 9.41 RCW);(v) Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300);(vi) Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310);(vii) Hate Crime (RCW 9A.36.080);(viii) Harassment where a subsequent violation or deadly threat is made (RCW 9A.46.020(2)(b));(ix) Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120);(x) Any felony conviction by a person 18 years of age or older with a special finding of involving a juvenile in a felony offense under RCW 9.94A.833;(xi) Residential Burglary (RCW 9A.52.025);(xii) Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030);(xiii) Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070);(xiv) Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080);(xv) Theft of a Motor Vehicle (RCW 9A.56.065);(xvi) Possession of a Stolen Motor Vehicle (RCW 9A.56.068);(xvii) Taking a Motor Vehicle Without Permission 1 (RCW 9A.56.070);(xviii) Taking a Motor Vehicle Without Permission 2 (RCW 9A.56.075);(xix) Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120);(xx) Extortion 2 (RCW 9A.56.130);(xxi) Intimidating a Witness (RCW 9A.72.110);(xxii) Tampering with a Witness (RCW 9A.72.120);(xxiii) Reckless Endangerment (RCW 9A.36.050);(xxiv) Coercion (RCW 9A.36.070);(xxv) Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020); or(xxvi) Malicious Mischief 3 (RCW 9A.48.090);(b) That at least one of the offenses listed in (a) of this subsection shall have occurred after July 1, 2008;(c) That the most recent committed offense listed in (a) of this subsection occurred within three years of a prior offense listed in (a) of this subsection; and(d) Of the offenses that were committed in (a) of this subsection, the offenses occurred on separate occasions or were committed by two or more persons.(37) "Persistent offender" is an offender who:(a)(i) Has been convicted in this state of any felony considered a most serious offense; and(ii) Has, before the commission of the offense under (a) of this subsection, been convicted as an offender on at least two separate occasions, whether in this state or elsewhere, of felonies that under the laws of this state would be considered most serious offenses and would be included in the offender score under RCW 9.94A.525; provided that of the two or more previous convictions, at least one conviction must have occurred before the commission of any of the other most serious offenses for which the offender was previously convicted; or(b)(i) Has been convicted of: (A) Rape in the first degree, rape of a child in the first degree, child molestation in the first degree, rape in the second degree, rape of a child in the second degree, or indecent liberties by forcible compulsion; (B) any of the following offenses with a finding of sexual motivation: Murder in the first degree, murder in the second degree, homicide by abuse, kidnapping in the first degree, kidnapping in the second degree, assault in the first degree, assault in the second degree, assault of a child in the first degree, assault of a child in the second degree, or burglary in the first degree; or (C) an attempt to commit any crime listed in this subsection (37)(b)(i); and(ii) Has, before the commission of the offense under (b)(i) of this subsection, been convicted as an offender on at least one occasion, whether in this state or elsewhere, of an offense listed in (b)(i) of this subsection or any federal or out-of-state offense or offense under prior Washington law that is comparable to the offenses listed in (b)(i) of this subsection. A conviction for rape of a child in the first degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this subsection only when the offender was 16 years of age or older when the offender committed the offense. A conviction for rape of a child in the second degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this subsection only when the offender was 18 years of age or older when the offender committed the offense.(38) "Predatory" means: (a) The perpetrator of the crime was a stranger to the victim, as defined in this section; (b) the perpetrator established or promoted a relationship with the victim prior to the offense and the victimization of the victim was a significant reason the perpetrator established or promoted the relationship; or (c) the perpetrator was: (i) A teacher, counselor, volunteer, or other person in authority in any public or private school and the victim was a student of the school under his or her authority or supervision. For purposes of this subsection, "school" does not include home-based instruction as defined in RCW 28A.225.010; (ii) a coach, trainer, volunteer, or other person in authority in any recreational activity and the victim was a participant in the activity under his or her authority or supervision; (iii) a pastor, elder, volunteer, or other person in authority in any church or religious organization, and the victim was a member or participant of the organization under his or her authority; or (iv) a teacher, counselor, volunteer, or other person in authority providing home-based instruction and the victim was a student receiving home-based instruction while under his or her authority or supervision. For purposes of this subsection: (A) "Home-based instruction" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 28A.225.010; and (B) "teacher, counselor, volunteer, or other person in authority" does not include the parent or legal guardian of the victim.(39) "Private school" means a school regulated under chapter 28A.195 or 28A.205 RCW.(40) "Public school" has the same meaning as in RCW 28A.150.010.(41) "Recidivist offense" means a felony offense where a prior conviction of the same offense or other specified offense is an element of the crime including, but not limited to:(a) Assault in the fourth degree where domestic violence is pleaded and proven, RCW 9A.36.041(3);(b) Cyber harassment, RCW 9A.90.120(2)(b)(i);(c) Harassment, RCW 9A.46.020(2)(b)(i);(d) Indecent exposure, RCW 9A.88.010(2)(c);(e) Stalking, RCW 9A.46.110(5)(b) (i) and (iii);(f) Telephone harassment, RCW 9.61.230(2)(a); and(g) Violation of a no-contact or protection order, RCW 7.105.450 or former RCW 26.50.110(5).(42) "Repetitive domestic violence offense" means any:(a)(i) Domestic violence assault that is not a felony offense under RCW 9A.36.041;(ii) Domestic violence violation of a no-contact order under chapter 10.99 RCW that is not a felony offense;(iii) Domestic violence violation of a protection order under chapter 26.09, 26.26A, or 26.26B RCW or former chapter 26.50 RCW, or violation of a domestic violence protection order under chapter 7.105 RCW, that is not a felony offense;(iv) Domestic violence harassment offense under RCW 9A.46.020 that is not a felony offense; or(v) Domestic violence stalking offense under RCW 9A.46.110 that is not a felony offense; or(b) Any federal, out-of-state, tribal court, military, county, or municipal conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be classified as a repetitive domestic violence offense under (a) of this subsection.(43) "Restitution" means a specific sum of money ordered by the sentencing court to be paid by the offender to the court over a specified period of time as payment of damages. The sum may include both public and private costs.(44) "Risk assessment" means the application of the risk instrument recommended to the department by the Washington state institute for public policy as having the highest degree of predictive accuracy for assessing an offender's risk of reoffense.(45) "Serious traffic offense" means:(a) Nonfelony driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502), nonfelony actual physical control while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.504), reckless driving (RCW 46.61.500), or hit-and-run an attended vehicle (RCW 46.52.020(5)); or(b) Any federal, out-of-state, county, or municipal conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be classified as a serious traffic offense under (a) of this subsection.(46) "Serious violent offense" is a subcategory of violent offense and means:(a)(i) Murder in the first degree;(ii) Homicide by abuse;(iii) Murder in the second degree;(iv) Manslaughter in the first degree;(v) Assault in the first degree;(vi) Kidnapping in the first degree;(vii) Rape in the first degree;(viii) Assault of a child in the first degree; or(ix) An attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit one of these felonies; or(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a serious violent offense under (a) of this subsection.(47) "Sex offense" means:(a)(i) A felony that is a violation of chapter 9A.44 RCW other than RCW 9A.44.132;(ii) A violation of RCW 9A.64.020;(iii) A felony that is a violation of chapter 9.68A RCW other than RCW 9.68A.080;(iv) A felony that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit such crimes; or(v) A felony violation of RCW 9A.44.132(1) (failure to register as a sex offender) if the person has been convicted of violating RCW 9A.44.132(1) (failure to register as a sex offender) or 9A.44.130 prior to June 10, 2010, on at least one prior occasion;(b) Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior to July 1, 1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a sex offense in (a) of this subsection;(c) A felony with a finding of sexual motivation under RCW 9.94A.835 or 13.40.135; or(d) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a sex offense under (a) of this subsection.(48) "Sexual motivation" means that one of the purposes for which the defendant committed the crime was for the purpose of his or her sexual gratification.(49) "Standard sentence range" means the sentencing court's discretionary range in imposing a nonappealable sentence.(50) "Statutory maximum sentence" means the maximum length of time for which an offender may be confined as punishment for a crime as prescribed in chapter 9A.20 RCW, RCW 9.92.010, the statute defining the crime, or other statute defining the maximum penalty for a crime.(51) "Stranger" means that the victim did not know the offender 24 hours before the offense.(52) "Total confinement" means confinement inside the physical boundaries of a facility or institution operated or utilized under contract by the state or any other unit of government for 24 hours a day, or pursuant to RCW 72.64.050 and 72.64.060.(53) "Transition training" means written and verbal instructions and assistance provided by the department to the offender during the two weeks prior to the offender's successful completion of the work ethic camp program. The transition training shall include instructions in the offender's requirements and obligations during the offender's period of community custody.(54) "Victim" means any person who has sustained emotional, psychological, physical, or financial injury to person or property as a direct result of the crime charged.(55) "Victim of domestic violence" means an intimate partner or household member who has been subjected to the infliction of physical harm or sexual and psychological abuse by an intimate partner or household member as part of a pattern of assaultive, coercive, and controlling behaviors directed at achieving compliance from or control over that intimate partner or household member. Domestic violence includes, but is not limited to, the offenses listed in RCW 10.99.020 and 26.50.010 committed by an intimate partner or household member against a victim who is an intimate partner or household member.(56) "Victim of sex trafficking, prostitution, or commercial sexual abuse of a minor" means a person who has been forced or coerced to perform a commercial sex act including, but not limited to, being a victim of offenses defined in RCW 9A.40.100, 9A.88.070, 9.68A.101, and the trafficking victims protection act of 2000, 22 U.S.C. Sec. 7101 et seq.; or a person who was induced to perform a commercial sex act when they were less than 18 years of age including but not limited to the offenses defined in chapter 9.68A RCW.(57) "Victim of sexual assault" means any person who is a victim of a sexual assault offense, nonconsensual sexual conduct, or nonconsensual sexual penetration and as a result suffers physical, emotional, financial, or psychological impacts. Sexual assault offenses include, but are not limited to, the offenses defined in chapter 9A.44 RCW.(58) "Violent offense" means:(a) Any of the following felonies:(i) Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or an attempt to commit a class A felony;(ii) Criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a class A felony;(iii) Manslaughter in the first degree;(iv) Manslaughter in the second degree;(v) Indecent liberties if committed by forcible compulsion;(vi) Kidnapping in the second degree;(vii) Arson in the second degree;(viii) Assault in the second degree;(ix) Assault of a child in the second degree;(x) Extortion in the first degree;(xi) Robbery in the second degree;(xii) Drive-by shooting;(xiii) Vehicular assault, when caused by the operation or driving of a vehicle by a person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless manner; and(xiv) Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of any vehicle by any person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner;(b) Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior to July 1, 1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a violent offense in (a) of this subsection; and(c) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a violent offense under (a) or (b) of this subsection.(59) "Work crew" means a program of partial confinement consisting of civic improvement tasks for the benefit of the community that complies with RCW 9.94A.725.(60) "Work ethic camp" means an alternative incarceration program as provided in RCW 9.94A.690 designed to reduce recidivism and lower the cost of corrections by requiring offenders to complete a comprehensive array of real-world job and vocational experiences, character-building work ethics training, life management skills development, substance abuse rehabilitation, counseling, literacy training, and basic adult education.(61) "Work release" means a program of partial confinement available to offenders who are employed or engaged as a student in a regular course of study at school.Sec. 3. RCW 9.94A.030 and 2024 c 306 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.(1) "Board" means the indeterminate sentence review board created under chapter 9.95 RCW.(2) "Collect," or any derivative thereof, "collect and remit," or "collect and deliver," when used with reference to the department, means that the department, either directly or through a collection agreement authorized by RCW 9.94A.760, is responsible for monitoring and enforcing the offender's sentence with regard to the legal financial obligation, receiving payment thereof from the offender, and, consistent with current law, delivering daily the entire payment to the superior court clerk without depositing it in a departmental account.(3) "Commission" means the sentencing guidelines commission.(4) "Community corrections officer" means an employee of the department who is responsible for carrying out specific duties in supervision of sentenced offenders and monitoring of sentence conditions.(5) "Community custody" means that portion of an offender's sentence of confinement in lieu of earned release time or imposed as part of a sentence under this chapter and served in the community subject to controls placed on the offender's movement and activities by the department.(6) "Community protection zone" means the area within 880 feet of the facilities and grounds of a public or private school.(7) "Community restitution" means compulsory service, without compensation, performed for the benefit of the community by the offender.(8) "Confinement" means total or partial confinement.(9) "Conviction" means an adjudication of guilt pursuant to Title 10 or 13 RCW and includes a verdict of guilty, a finding of guilty, and acceptance of a plea of guilty.(10) "Crime-related prohibition" means an order of a court prohibiting conduct that directly relates to the circumstances of the crime for which the offender has been convicted, and shall not be construed to mean orders directing an offender affirmatively to participate in rehabilitative programs or to otherwise perform affirmative conduct. However, affirmative acts necessary to monitor compliance with the order of a court may be required by the department.(11) "Criminal history" means the list of a defendant's prior convictions and juvenile adjudications, whether in this state, in federal court, or elsewhere, and any issued certificates of restoration of opportunity pursuant to RCW 9.97.020.(a) The history shall include, where known, for each conviction (i) whether the defendant has been placed on probation and the length and terms thereof; and (ii) whether the defendant has been incarcerated and the length of incarceration.(b) A conviction may be removed from a defendant's criminal history only if it is vacated pursuant to RCW 9.96.060, 9.94A.640, 9.95.240, or a similar out-of-state statute, or if the conviction has been vacated pursuant to a governor's pardon. However, when a defendant is charged with a recidivist offense, "criminal history" includes a vacated prior conviction for the sole purpose of establishing that such vacated prior conviction constitutes an element of the present recidivist offense as provided in RCW 9.94A.640(4)(b) and 9.96.060(((7)))(8)(c).(c) The determination of a defendant's criminal history is distinct from the determination of an offender score. A prior conviction that was not included in an offender score calculated pursuant to a former version of the sentencing reform act remains part of the defendant's criminal history.(12) "Criminal street gang" means any ongoing organization, association, or group of three or more persons, whether formal or informal, having a common name or common identifying sign or symbol, having as one of its primary activities the commission of criminal acts, and whose members or associates individually or collectively engage in or have engaged in a pattern of criminal street gang activity. This definition does not apply to employees engaged in concerted activities for their mutual aid and protection, or to the activities of labor and bona fide nonprofit organizations or their members or agents.(13) "Criminal street gang associate or member" means any person who actively participates in any criminal street gang and who intentionally promotes, furthers, or assists in any criminal act by the criminal street gang.(14) "Criminal street gang-related offense" means any felony or misdemeanor offense, whether in this state or elsewhere, that is committed for the benefit of, at the direction of, or in association with any criminal street gang, or is committed with the intent to promote, further, or assist in any criminal conduct by the gang, or is committed for one or more of the following reasons:(a) To gain admission, prestige, or promotion within the gang;(b) To increase or maintain the gang's size, membership, prestige, dominance, or control in any geographical area;(c) To exact revenge or retribution for the gang or any member of the gang;(d) To obstruct justice, or intimidate or eliminate any witness against the gang or any member of the gang;(e) To directly or indirectly cause any benefit, aggrandizement, gain, profit, or other advantage for the gang, its reputation, influence, or membership; or(f) To provide the gang with any advantage in, or any control or dominance over any criminal market sector, including, but not limited to, manufacturing, delivering, or selling any controlled substance (chapter 69.50 RCW); arson (chapter 9A.48 RCW); trafficking in stolen property (chapter 9A.82 RCW); promoting prostitution (chapter 9A.88 RCW); human trafficking (RCW 9A.40.100); promoting commercial sexual abuse of a minor (RCW 9.68A.101); or promoting pornography (chapter 9.68 RCW).(15) "Day fine" means a fine imposed by the sentencing court that equals the difference between the offender's net daily income and the reasonable obligations that the offender has for the support of the offender and any dependents.(16) "Day reporting" means a program of enhanced supervision designed to monitor the offender's daily activities and compliance with sentence conditions, and in which the offender is required to report daily to a specific location designated by the department or the sentencing court.(17) "Department" means the department of corrections.(18) "Determinate sentence" means a sentence that states with exactitude the number of actual years, months, or days of total confinement, of partial confinement, of community custody, the number of actual hours or days of community restitution work, or dollars or terms of a legal financial obligation. The fact that an offender through earned release can reduce the actual period of confinement shall not affect the classification of the sentence as a determinate sentence.(19) "Disposable earnings" means that part of the earnings of an offender remaining after the deduction from those earnings of any amount required by law to be withheld. For the purposes of this definition, "earnings" means compensation paid or payable for personal services, whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, bonuses, or otherwise, and, notwithstanding any other provision of law making the payments exempt from garnishment, attachment, or other process to satisfy a court-ordered legal financial obligation, specifically includes periodic payments pursuant to pension or retirement programs, or insurance policies of any type, but does not include payments made under Title 50 RCW, except as provided in RCW 50.40.020 and 50.40.050, or Title 74 RCW.(20)(a) "Domestic violence" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 10.99.020.(b) "Domestic violence" also means: (i) Physical harm, bodily injury, assault, or the infliction of fear of imminent physical harm, bodily injury, or assault, sexual assault, or stalking, as defined in RCW 9A.46.110, of one intimate partner by another intimate partner as defined in RCW 10.99.020; or (ii) physical harm, bodily injury, assault, or the infliction of fear of imminent physical harm, bodily injury, or assault, sexual assault, or stalking, as defined in RCW 9A.46.110, of one family or household member by another family or household member as defined in RCW 10.99.020.(21) "Drug offender sentencing alternative" is a sentencing option available to persons convicted of a felony offense who are eligible for the option under RCW 9.94A.660.(22) "Drug offender sentencing alternative for driving under the influence" is a sentencing option available to persons convicted of felony driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug under RCW 46.61.502(6), or felony physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug under RCW 46.61.504(6) who are eligible under RCW 9.94A.661.(23) "Drug offense" means:(a) Any felony violation of chapter 69.50 RCW except possession of a controlled substance (RCW 69.50.4013) or forged prescription for a controlled substance (RCW 69.50.403);(b) Any offense defined as a felony under federal law that relates to the possession, manufacture, distribution, or transportation of a controlled substance; or(c) Any out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a drug offense under (a) of this subsection.(24) "Earned release" means earned release from confinement as provided in RCW 9.94A.728.(25) "Electronic monitoring" means tracking the location of an individual through the use of technology that is capable of determining or identifying the monitored individual's presence or absence at a particular location including, but not limited to:(a) Radio frequency signaling technology, which detects if the monitored individual is or is not at an approved location and notifies the monitoring agency of the time that the monitored individual either leaves the approved location or tampers with or removes the monitoring device; or(b) Active or passive global positioning system technology, which detects the location of the monitored individual and notifies the monitoring agency of the monitored individual's location and which may also include electronic monitoring with victim notification technology that is capable of notifying a victim or protected party, either directly or through a monitoring agency, if the monitored individual enters within the restricted distance of a victim or protected party, or within the restricted distance of a designated location.(26) "Escape" means:(a) Sexually violent predator escape (RCW 9A.76.115), escape in the first degree (RCW 9A.76.110), escape in the second degree (RCW 9A.76.120), willful failure to return from furlough (RCW 72.66.060), willful failure to return from work release (RCW 72.65.070), or willful failure to be available for supervision by the department while in community custody (RCW 72.09.310); or(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as an escape under (a) of this subsection.(27) "Felony traffic offense" means:(a) Vehicular homicide (RCW 46.61.520), vehicular assault (RCW 46.61.522), eluding a police officer (RCW 46.61.024), felony hit-and-run injury-accident (RCW 46.52.020(4)), felony driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502(6)), or felony physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.504(6)); or(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a felony traffic offense under (a) of this subsection.(28) "Fine" means a specific sum of money ordered by the sentencing court to be paid by the offender to the court over a specific period of time.(29) "First-time offender" means any person who has no prior convictions for a felony and is eligible for the first-time offender waiver under RCW 9.94A.650.(30) "Home detention" is a subset of electronic monitoring and means a program of partial confinement available to offenders wherein the offender is confined in a private residence 24 hours a day, unless an absence from the residence is approved, authorized, or otherwise permitted in the order by the court or other supervising agency that ordered home detention, and the offender is subject to electronic monitoring.(31) "Homelessness" or "homeless" means a condition where an individual lacks a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence and who has a primary nighttime residence that is:(a) A supervised, publicly or privately operated shelter designed to provide temporary living accommodations;(b) A public or private place not designed for, or ordinarily used as, a regular sleeping accommodation for human beings; or(c) A private residence where the individual stays as a transient invitee.(32) "Legal financial obligation" means a sum of money that is ordered by a superior court of the state of Washington for legal financial obligations which may include restitution to the victim, statutorily imposed crime victims' compensation fees as assessed pursuant to RCW 7.68.035, court costs, county or interlocal drug funds, court-appointed attorneys' fees, and costs of defense, fines, and any other financial obligation that is assessed to the offender as a result of a felony conviction. Upon conviction for vehicular assault while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.522(1)(b), or vehicular homicide while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.520(1)(a), legal financial obligations may also include payment to a public agency of the expense of an emergency response to the incident resulting in the conviction, subject to RCW 38.52.430.(33) "Most serious offense" means any of the following felonies or a felony attempt to commit any of the following felonies:(a) Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a class A felony;(b) Assault in the second degree;(c) Assault of a child in the second degree;(d) Child molestation in the second degree;(e) Controlled substance homicide;(f) Extortion in the first degree;(g) Incest when committed against a child under age 14;(h) Indecent liberties;(i) Kidnapping in the second degree;(j) Leading organized crime;(k) Manslaughter in the first degree;(l) Manslaughter in the second degree;(m) Promoting prostitution in the first degree;(n) Rape in the third degree;(o) Sexual exploitation;(p) Vehicular assault, when caused by the operation or driving of a vehicle by a person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless manner;(q) Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of any vehicle by any person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner;(r) Any other class B felony offense with a finding of sexual motivation;(s) Any other felony with a deadly weapon verdict under RCW 9.94A.825;(t) Any felony offense in effect at any time prior to December 2, 1993, that is comparable to a most serious offense under this subsection, or any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a most serious offense under this subsection;(u)(i) A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (c), chapter 260, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess. as it existed until July 1, 1979, RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (c) as it existed from July 1, 1979, until June 11, 1986, and RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (d) as it existed from June 11, 1986, until July 1, 1988;(ii) A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW 9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from June 11, 1986, until July 1, 1988, if: (A) The crime was committed against a child under the age of 14; or (B) the relationship between the victim and perpetrator is included in the definition of indecent liberties under RCW 9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from July 1, 1988, through July 27, 1997, or RCW 9A.44.100(1) (d) or (e) as it existed from July 25, 1993, through July 27, 1997;(v) Any out-of-state conviction for a felony offense with a finding of sexual motivation if the minimum sentence imposed was 10 years or more; provided that the out-of-state felony offense must be comparable to a felony offense under this title and Title 9A RCW and the out-of-state definition of sexual motivation must be comparable to the definition of sexual motivation contained in this section.(34) "Nonviolent offense" means an offense which is not a violent offense.(35) "Offender" means a person who has committed a felony established by state law and is 18 years of age or older or is less than 18 years of age but whose case is under superior court jurisdiction under RCW 13.04.030 or has been transferred by the appropriate juvenile court to a criminal court pursuant to RCW 13.40.110. In addition, for the purpose of community custody requirements under this chapter, "offender" also means a misdemeanant or gross misdemeanant probationer ordered by a superior court to probation pursuant to RCW 9.92.060, 9.95.204, or 9.95.210 and supervised by the department pursuant to RCW 9.94A.501 and 9.94A.5011. Throughout this chapter, the terms "offender" and "defendant" are used interchangeably.(36) "Partial confinement" means confinement ((for no more than one year))up to 18 months in a facility or institution operated or utilized under contract by the state or any other unit of government, or, if home detention, electronic monitoring, or work crew has been ordered by the court or home detention has been ordered by the department as part of the parenting program or the graduated reentry program, in an approved residence, for a substantial portion of each day with the balance of the day spent in the community. Partial confinement includes work release, home detention, work crew, electronic monitoring, and a combination of work crew, electronic monitoring, and home detention.(37) "Pattern of criminal street gang activity" means:(a) The commission, attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation of, or any prior juvenile adjudication of or adult conviction of, two or more of the following criminal street gang-related offenses:(i) Any "serious violent" felony offense as defined in this section, excluding Homicide by Abuse (RCW 9A.32.055) and Assault of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120);(ii) Any "violent" offense as defined by this section, excluding Assault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130);(iii) Deliver or Possession with Intent to Deliver a Controlled Substance (chapter 69.50 RCW);(iv) Any violation of the firearms and dangerous weapon act (chapter 9.41 RCW);(v) Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300);(vi) Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310);(vii) Hate Crime (RCW 9A.36.080);(viii) Harassment where a subsequent violation or deadly threat is made (RCW 9A.46.020(2)(b));(ix) Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120);(x) Any felony conviction by a person 18 years of age or older with a special finding of involving a juvenile in a felony offense under RCW 9.94A.833;(xi) Residential Burglary (RCW 9A.52.025);(xii) Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030);(xiii) Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070);(xiv) Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080);(xv) Theft of a Motor Vehicle (RCW 9A.56.065);(xvi) Possession of a Stolen Motor Vehicle (RCW 9A.56.068);(xvii) Taking a Motor Vehicle Without Permission 1 (RCW 9A.56.070);(xviii) Taking a Motor Vehicle Without Permission 2 (RCW 9A.56.075);(xix) Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120);(xx) Extortion 2 (RCW 9A.56.130);(xxi) Intimidating a Witness (RCW 9A.72.110);(xxii) Tampering with a Witness (RCW 9A.72.120);(xxiii) Reckless Endangerment (RCW 9A.36.050);(xxiv) Coercion (RCW 9A.36.070);(xxv) Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020); or(xxvi) Malicious Mischief 3 (RCW 9A.48.090);(b) That at least one of the offenses listed in (a) of this subsection shall have occurred after July 1, 2008;(c) That the most recent committed offense listed in (a) of this subsection occurred within three years of a prior offense listed in (a) of this subsection; and(d) Of the offenses that were committed in (a) of this subsection, the offenses occurred on separate occasions or were committed by two or more persons.(38) "Persistent offender" is an offender who:(a)(i) Has been convicted in this state of any felony considered a most serious offense; and(ii) Has, before the commission of the offense under (a) of this subsection, been convicted as an offender on at least two separate occasions, whether in this state or elsewhere, of felonies that under the laws of this state would be considered most serious offenses and would be included in the offender score under RCW 9.94A.525; provided that of the two or more previous convictions, at least one conviction must have occurred before the commission of any of the other most serious offenses for which the offender was previously convicted; or(b)(i) Has been convicted of: (A) Rape in the first degree, rape of a child in the first degree, child molestation in the first degree, rape in the second degree, rape of a child in the second degree, or indecent liberties by forcible compulsion; (B) any of the following offenses with a finding of sexual motivation: Murder in the first degree, murder in the second degree, homicide by abuse, kidnapping in the first degree, kidnapping in the second degree, assault in the first degree, assault in the second degree, assault of a child in the first degree, assault of a child in the second degree, or burglary in the first degree; or (C) an attempt to commit any crime listed in this subsection (38)(b)(i); and(ii) Has, before the commission of the offense under (b)(i) of this subsection, been convicted as an offender on at least one occasion, whether in this state or elsewhere, of an offense listed in (b)(i) of this subsection or any federal or out-of-state offense or offense under prior Washington law that is comparable to the offenses listed in (b)(i) of this subsection. A conviction for rape of a child in the first degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this subsection only when the offender was 16 years of age or older when the offender committed the offense. A conviction for rape of a child in the second degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this subsection only when the offender was 18 years of age or older when the offender committed the offense.(39) "Predatory" means: (a) The perpetrator of the crime was a stranger to the victim, as defined in this section; (b) the perpetrator established or promoted a relationship with the victim prior to the offense and the victimization of the victim was a significant reason the perpetrator established or promoted the relationship; or (c) the perpetrator was: (i) A teacher, counselor, volunteer, or other person in authority in any public or private school and the victim was a student of the school under his or her authority or supervision. For purposes of this subsection, "school" does not include home-based instruction as defined in RCW 28A.225.010; (ii) a coach, trainer, volunteer, or other person in authority in any recreational activity and the victim was a participant in the activity under his or her authority or supervision; (iii) a pastor, elder, volunteer, or other person in authority in any church or religious organization, and the victim was a member or participant of the organization under his or her authority; or (iv) a teacher, counselor, volunteer, or other person in authority providing home-based instruction and the victim was a student receiving home-based instruction while under his or her authority or supervision. For purposes of this subsection: (A) "Home-based instruction" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 28A.225.010; and (B) "teacher, counselor, volunteer, or other person in authority" does not include the parent or legal guardian of the victim.(40) "Private school" means a school regulated under chapter 28A.195 or 28A.205 RCW.(41) "Public school" has the same meaning as in RCW 28A.150.010.(42) "Recidivist offense" means a felony offense where a prior conviction of the same offense or other specified offense is an element of the crime including, but not limited to:(a) Assault in the fourth degree where domestic violence is pleaded and proven, RCW 9A.36.041(3);(b) Cyber harassment, RCW 9A.90.120(2)(b)(i);(c) Harassment, RCW 9A.46.020(2)(b)(i);(d) Indecent exposure, RCW 9A.88.010(2)(c);(e) Stalking, RCW 9A.46.110(5)(b) (i) and (iii);(f) Telephone harassment, RCW 9.61.230(2)(a); and(g) Violation of a no-contact or protection order, RCW 7.105.450 or former RCW 26.50.110(5).(43) "Repetitive domestic violence offense" means any:(a)(i) Domestic violence assault that is not a felony offense under RCW 9A.36.041;(ii) Domestic violence violation of a no-contact order under chapter 10.99 RCW that is not a felony offense;(iii) Domestic violence violation of a protection order under chapter 26.09, 26.26A, or 26.26B RCW or former chapter 26.50 RCW, or violation of a domestic violence protection order under chapter 7.105 RCW, that is not a felony offense;(iv) Domestic violence harassment offense under RCW 9A.46.020 that is not a felony offense; or(v) Domestic violence stalking offense under RCW 9A.46.110 that is not a felony offense; or(b) Any federal, out-of-state, tribal court, military, county, or municipal conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be classified as a repetitive domestic violence offense under (a) of this subsection.(44) "Restitution" means a specific sum of money ordered by the sentencing court to be paid by the offender to the court over a specified period of time as payment of damages. The sum may include both public and private costs.(45) "Risk assessment" means the application of the risk instrument recommended to the department by the Washington state institute for public policy as having the highest degree of predictive accuracy for assessing an offender's risk of reoffense.(46) "Serious traffic offense" means:(a)(i) Nonfelony driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502);(ii) Nonfelony actual physical control while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.504);(iii) Reckless driving (RCW 46.61.500);(iv) Negligent driving if the conviction is the result of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance, or of RCW 46.61.520 or 46.61.522 while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.5249);(v) Reckless endangerment if the conviction is the result of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance, or of RCW 46.61.520 or 46.61.522 while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 9A.36.050); or(vi) Hit-and-run an attended vehicle (RCW 46.52.020(5)); or(b) Any federal, out-of-state, county, or municipal conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be classified as a serious traffic offense under (a) of this subsection.(c) This definition applies for the purpose of a personal driver's license only and does not apply to violations related to a commercial motor vehicle under RCW 46.25.090.(47) "Serious violent offense" is a subcategory of violent offense and means:(a)(i) Murder in the first degree;(ii) Homicide by abuse;(iii) Murder in the second degree;(iv) Manslaughter in the first degree;(v) Assault in the first degree;(vi) Kidnapping in the first degree;(vii) Rape in the first degree;(viii) Assault of a child in the first degree; or(ix) An attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit one of these felonies; or(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a serious violent offense under (a) of this subsection.(48) "Sex offense" means:(a)(i) A felony that is a violation of chapter 9A.44 RCW other than RCW 9A.44.132;(ii) A violation of RCW 9A.64.020;(iii) A felony that is a violation of chapter 9.68A RCW other than RCW 9.68A.080;(iv) A felony that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit such crimes; or(v) A felony violation of RCW 9A.44.132(1) (failure to register as a sex offender) if the person has been convicted of violating RCW 9A.44.132(1) (failure to register as a sex offender) or 9A.44.130 prior to June 10, 2010, on at least one prior occasion;(b) Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior to July 1, 1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a sex offense in (a) of this subsection;(c) A felony with a finding of sexual motivation under RCW 9.94A.835 or 13.40.135; or(d) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a sex offense under (a) of this subsection.(49) "Sexual motivation" means that one of the purposes for which the defendant committed the crime was for the purpose of his or her sexual gratification.(50) "Standard sentence range" means the sentencing court's discretionary range in imposing a nonappealable sentence.(51) "Statutory maximum sentence" means the maximum length of time for which an offender may be confined as punishment for a crime as prescribed in chapter 9A.20 RCW, RCW 9.92.010, the statute defining the crime, or other statute defining the maximum penalty for a crime.(52) "Stranger" means that the victim did not know the offender 24 hours before the offense.(53) "Total confinement" means confinement inside the physical boundaries of a facility or institution operated or utilized under contract by the state or any other unit of government for 24 hours a day, or pursuant to RCW 72.64.050 and 72.64.060.(54) "Transition training" means written and verbal instructions and assistance provided by the department to the offender during the two weeks prior to the offender's successful completion of the work ethic camp program. The transition training shall include instructions in the offender's requirements and obligations during the offender's period of community custody.(55) "Victim" means any person who has sustained emotional, psychological, physical, or financial injury to person or property as a direct result of the crime charged.(56) "Victim of domestic violence" means an intimate partner or household member who has been subjected to the infliction of physical harm or sexual and psychological abuse by an intimate partner or household member as part of a pattern of assaultive, coercive, and controlling behaviors directed at achieving compliance from or control over that intimate partner or household member. Domestic violence includes, but is not limited to, the offenses listed in RCW 10.99.020 and 26.50.010 committed by an intimate partner or household member against a victim who is an intimate partner or household member.(57) "Victim of sex trafficking, prostitution, or commercial sexual abuse of a minor" means a person who has been forced or coerced to perform a commercial sex act including, but not limited to, being a victim of offenses defined in RCW 9A.40.100, 9A.88.070, 9.68A.101, and the trafficking victims protection act of 2000, 22 U.S.C. Sec. 7101 et seq.; or a person who was induced to perform a commercial sex act when they were less than 18 years of age including but not limited to the offenses defined in chapter 9.68A RCW.(58) "Victim of sexual assault" means any person who is a victim of a sexual assault offense, nonconsensual sexual conduct, or nonconsensual sexual penetration and as a result suffers physical, emotional, financial, or psychological impacts. Sexual assault offenses include, but are not limited to, the offenses defined in chapter 9A.44 RCW.(59) "Violent offense" means:(a) Any of the following felonies:(i) Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or an attempt to commit a class A felony;(ii) Criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a class A felony;(iii) Manslaughter in the first degree;(iv) Manslaughter in the second degree;(v) Indecent liberties if committed by forcible compulsion;(vi) Kidnapping in the second degree;(vii) Arson in the second degree;(viii) Assault in the second degree;(ix) Assault of a child in the second degree;(x) Extortion in the first degree;(xi) Robbery in the second degree;(xii) Drive-by shooting;(xiii) Vehicular assault, when caused by the operation or driving of a vehicle by a person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless manner; and(xiv) Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of any vehicle by any person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner;(b) Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior to July 1, 1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a violent offense in (a) of this subsection; and(c) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a violent offense under (a) or (b) of this subsection.(60) "Work crew" means a program of partial confinement consisting of civic improvement tasks for the benefit of the community that complies with RCW 9.94A.725.(61) "Work ethic camp" means an alternative incarceration program as provided in RCW 9.94A.690 designed to reduce recidivism and lower the cost of corrections by requiring offenders to complete a comprehensive array of real-world job and vocational experiences, character-building work ethics training, life management skills development, substance abuse rehabilitation, counseling, literacy training, and basic adult education.(62) "Work release" means a program of partial confinement available to offenders who are employed or engaged as a student in a regular course of study at school.Sec. 4. RCW 9.94A.6551 and 2024 c 193 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(((a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, for))For an incarcerated individual not sentenced under RCW 9.94A.655, but otherwise eligible under this section, no more than the final ((12))18 months of the incarcerated individual's term of confinement may be served in partial confinement as home detention as part of the parenting program developed by the department.(((b) For an incarcerated individual not sentenced under RCW 9.94A.655, but otherwise eligible under this section, who is participating in the residential parenting program at the department, no more than the final 18 months of the incarcerated individual's term of confinement may be served in partial confinement as home detention as part of the parenting program developed by the department.))(2) The secretary may transfer an incarcerated individual from a correctional facility to home detention in the community if it is determined that the parenting program is an appropriate placement and when all of the following conditions exist:(a) The incarcerated individual is serving a sentence in which the high end of the range is greater than one year;(b) The incarcerated individual has no current conviction for a felony that is classified as a sex offense or a serious violent offense;(c) The incarcerated individual has no current conviction for a violent offense, or where the incarcerated individual has a current conviction for a violent offense, he or she has not been determined to be a high risk to reoffend;(d) The incarcerated individual signs any release of information waivers required to allow information regarding current or prior child welfare cases to be shared with the department and the court;(e) The incarcerated individual is:(i) A parent with guardianship or legal custody of a minor child;(ii) An expectant parent; ((or))(iii) A biological parent, adoptive parent, custodian, caregiver, or stepparent with a proven, established, ongoing, and substantial relationship with a minor child that existed at the time of the offense; or(iv) An individual expected to take over the duties of a caregiver or parent and be responsible for exercising the day-to-day care and control of a minor child, who has a proven, established, ongoing, and substantial relationship with the minor child, and who is not prohibited from contact with a minor child by any law, court order, or any other restriction; and(f) The department determines that the incarcerated individual's participation in the parenting program is in the best interests of the child. Nothing in this section provides the department with authority to determine placement of a minor child.(3) Except for sex offenses and serious violent offenses, prior juvenile adjudications are not considered offenses when considering eligibility for the parenting program developed by the department.(4) When the department is considering partial confinement as part of the parenting program for an incarcerated individual, the department shall inquire of the individual and the department of children, youth, and families whether the agency has an open child welfare case or prior substantiated referral for abuse or neglect involving the incarcerated individual.(5) If the department of children, youth, and families or a tribal jurisdiction has an open child welfare case, the department will seek input from the department of children, youth, and families or the involved tribal jurisdiction as to: (a) The status of the child welfare case; and (b) recommendations regarding placement of the incarcerated individual, services agreed to by the incarcerated individual working voluntarily with the department, or services ordered by the court within the incarcerated individual's child welfare case. The department and its officers, agents, and employees are not liable for the acts of incarcerated individuals participating in the parenting program unless the department or its officers, agents, and employees acted with willful and wanton disregard.(6) All incarcerated individuals placed on home detention as part of the parenting program shall provide an approved residence and living arrangement prior to transfer to home detention.(7) The department may not transfer an incarcerated individual to participate in the parenting program until the department has a clinically appropriate evaluation for substance use disorder. If the incarcerated individual is diagnosed to have a substance use disorder, the department shall assist the incarcerated individual in enrolling in substance use disorder treatment services at the level deemed clinically appropriate. Individuals transferred to participate in the parenting program, and diagnosed with a substance use disorder, must begin receiving substance use disorder treatment services as soon as practicable after transfer to avoid any delays in treatment. Substance use disorder treatment services shall include, as deemed necessary by the evaluation, access to medication-assisted treatment and counseling programs. Upon transfer to the parenting program, when clinically appropriate, individuals must be provided with access to self-administered fentanyl testing supplies and medications designed to reverse the effects of opioid overdose.(8) While in the community on home detention as part of the parenting program, the department shall:(a) Require the individual to be placed on electronic home monitoring;(b) Require the individual to participate in programming and treatment that the department determines is needed after consideration of the individual's stated needs;(c) Assign a community corrections officer who will monitor the individual's compliance with conditions of partial confinement and programming requirements; and(d) If the individual has an open child welfare case with the department of children, youth, and families, collaborate and communicate with the identified social worker in the provision of services.(((8)))(9) The department has the authority to return any incarcerated individual serving partial confinement in the parenting program to total confinement if the individual is not complying with sentence requirements.(((9)))(10) If the individual's earned release date changes after placement in partial confinement under this section, the department may extend the duration of participation in the alternative program by no more than six months or up to the earned release date, whichever comes first.(11) For the purposes of this section:(a) "Expectant parent" means a pregnant or other parent awaiting the birth of his or her child, or an adoptive parent or person in the process of a final adoption.(b) "Minor child" means a child under the age of ((eighteen))18.(((c) "Residential parenting program" means a correctional nursery program administered by the department that allows pregnant, minimum security incarcerated individuals that meet eligibility criteria established by the department to keep their newborn children with them after giving birth in a designated unit and receive support and education in alliance with skilled early childhood educators.))Sec. 5. RCW 9.94A.733 and 2023 c 405 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, an ((offender))incarcerated individual may not participate in the graduated reentry program under this subsection unless he or she has served at least six months in total confinement in a state correctional facility.(i) An ((offender))incarcerated individual subject to (a) of this subsection may serve no more than the final ((five))nine months of the ((offender's))incarcerated individual's term of confinement in partial confinement as home detention as part of the graduated reentry program developed by the department.(ii) Home detention under (a) of this subsection may not be imposed for individuals subject to a deportation order, civil commitment, or the interstate compact for adult offender supervision under RCW 9.94A.745.(b) For ((offenders))incarcerated individuals who meet the requirements of (b)(iii) of this subsection, an ((offender))incarcerated individual may not participate in the graduated reentry program unless he or she has served at least ((four))three months in total confinement in a state correctional facility.(i) An ((offender))incarcerated individual under this subsection (1)(b) may serve no more than the final 18 months of the ((offender's))incarcerated individual's term of confinement in partial confinement as home detention as part of the graduated reentry program developed by the department.(ii) Home detention under this subsection (1)(b) may not be imposed for individuals subject to a deportation order or subject to the jurisdiction of the indeterminate sentence review board.(iii) Home detention under this subsection (1)(b) may not be imposed for ((offenders))incarcerated individuals currently serving a term of confinement for the following offenses:(A) Any sex offense;(B) Any violent offense; or(C) Any crime against a person offense in accordance with the categorization of crimes against persons outlined in RCW 9.94A.411(2).(2) The secretary of the department may transfer an ((offender))incarcerated individual from a department correctional facility to home detention in the community if it is determined that the graduated reentry program is an appropriate placement and must assist the ((offender's))incarcerated individual's transition from confinement to the community.(3) The department and its officers, agents, and employees are not liable for the acts of ((offenders))individuals participating in the graduated reentry program unless the department or its officers, agents, and employees acted with willful and wanton disregard.(4)(a) All ((offenders))incarcerated individuals placed on home detention as part of the graduated reentry program must provide an approved residence and living arrangement prior to transfer to home detention.(b) The department may not transfer an ((offender))incarcerated individual to participate in the graduated reentry program until the department has ((conducted)) a ((comprehensive assessment))clinically appropriate evaluation for substance use disorder. If the ((offender))incarcerated individual is ((assessed))diagnosed to have a substance use disorder, the department shall assist the ((offender))incarcerated individual in enrolling in substance use disorder treatment services at the level deemed clinically appropriate ((by the assessment)). ((Offenders))Individuals transferred to participate in the graduated reentry program, and diagnosed with a substance use disorder, must begin receiving substance use disorder treatment services as soon as practicable after transfer to avoid any delays in treatment. Substance use disorder treatment services shall include, as deemed necessary by the ((assessment))evaluation, access to medication-assisted treatment and counseling programs. Upon transfer to the graduated reentry program, when clinically appropriate, individuals must be provided with access to self-administered fentanyl testing supplies and medications designed to reverse the effects of opioid overdose.(5) While in the community on home detention as part of the graduated reentry program, the department must:(a) Require the ((offender))individual to be placed on electronic home monitoring;(b) Require the ((offender))individual to participate in programming and treatment that the department shall assign based on an ((offender's))individual's assessed need; and(c) Assign a community corrections officer who will monitor the ((offender's))individual's compliance with conditions of partial confinement and programming requirements.(6) The department retains the authority to return any ((offender))individual serving partial confinement in the graduated reentry program to total confinement for any reason including, but not limited to, the ((offender's))individual's noncompliance with any sentence requirement.(7) The department may issue rental vouchers for a period not to exceed six months for those transferring to partial confinement under this section if an approved address cannot be obtained without the assistance of a voucher.(8) In the selection of ((offenders))incarcerated individuals to participate in the graduated reentry program, and in setting, modifying, and enforcing the requirements of the graduated reentry program, the department is deemed to be performing a quasi-judicial function.(9) The department shall publish a monthly report on its website with the number of ((offenders))incarcerated individuals who were transferred during the month to home detention as part of the graduated reentry program. The department shall submit an annual report by December 1st to the appropriate committees of the legislature with the number of ((offenders))incarcerated individuals who were transferred to home detention as part of the graduated reentry program during the prior year.(10)(a) Beginning July 1, 2023, the following data must be collected and posted to the department's website on a monthly basis:(i) The number of ((offenders))incarcerated individuals who were transferred to the graduated reentry program who were assessed to have a substance use disorder during the prior calendar month; and(ii) The number of ((offenders))individuals in the graduated reentry program who received during the prior 12 months:(A) Outpatient substance use disorder treatment;(B) Inpatient substance use disorder treatment; and(C) Both outpatient and inpatient substance use disorder treatment.(b) Beginning July 1, 2023, the health care authority must report monthly to the department on the number of ((offenders))individuals in the graduated reentry program who received substance use disorder outpatient treatment, while in the community, during the prior 12 months.(11) The department must share data with the health care authority on ((offenders))individuals participating in the graduated reentry program.Sec. 6. RCW 9.94A.728 and 2023 c 358 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) No incarcerated individual serving a sentence imposed pursuant to this chapter and committed to the custody of the department shall leave the confines of the correctional facility or be released prior to the expiration of the sentence except as follows:(a) An incarcerated individual may earn early release time as authorized by RCW 9.94A.729;(b) An incarcerated individual may leave a correctional facility pursuant to an authorized furlough or leave of absence. In addition, incarcerated individuals may leave a correctional facility when in the custody of a corrections officer or officers;(c)(i) The secretary may authorize an extraordinary medical placement for an incarcerated individual when all of the following conditions exist:(A) The incarcerated individual has been assessed by two physicians and is determined to be one of the following:(I) Affected by a permanent or degenerative medical condition to such a degree that the individual does not presently, and likely will not in the future, pose a threat to public safety; or(II) In ill health and is expected to die within six months and does not presently, and likely will not in the future, pose a threat to public safety;(B) The incarcerated individual has been assessed as low risk to the community at the time of release; and(C) It is expected that granting the extraordinary medical placement will result in a cost savings to the state.(ii) An incarcerated individual sentenced to death or to life imprisonment without the possibility of release or parole is not eligible for an extraordinary medical placement.(iii) The secretary shall require electronic monitoring for all individuals in extraordinary medical placement unless the electronic monitoring equipment is detrimental to the individual's health, interferes with the function of the individual's medical equipment, or results in the loss of funding for the individual's medical care, in which case, an alternative type of monitoring shall be utilized. The secretary shall specify who shall provide the monitoring services and the terms under which the monitoring shall be performed.(iv) The secretary may revoke an extraordinary medical placement under this subsection (1)(c) at any time.(v) Persistent offenders are not eligible for extraordinary medical placement;(d) The governor, upon recommendation from the clemency and pardons board, may grant an extraordinary release for reasons of serious health problems, senility, advanced age, extraordinary meritorious acts, or other extraordinary circumstances;(e) No more than the final ((12))18 months of the incarcerated individual's term of confinement may be served in partial confinement for aiding the incarcerated individual with: Finding work as part of the work release program under chapter 72.65 RCW; ((or)) reestablishing himself or herself in the community as part of the parenting program in RCW 9.94A.6551. This is in addition to that period of earned early release time that may be exchanged for partial confinement pursuant to RCW 9.94A.729(5)(d);(f)(i) No more than the final ((five))nine months of the incarcerated individual's term of confinement may be served in partial confinement as home detention as part of the graduated reentry program developed by the department under RCW 9.94A.733(1)(a);(ii) For eligible incarcerated individuals under RCW 9.94A.733(1)(b), after serving at least ((four))three months in total confinement in a state correctional facility, an incarcerated individual may serve no more than the final 18 months of the incarcerated individual's term of confinement in partial confinement as home detention as part of the graduated reentry program developed by the department;(g) The governor may pardon any incarcerated individual;(h) The department may release an incarcerated individual from confinement any time within 10 days before a release date calculated under this section;(i) An incarcerated individual may leave a correctional facility prior to completion of his or her sentence if the sentence has been reduced as provided in RCW 9.94A.870;(j) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, an incarcerated individual sentenced for a felony crime listed in RCW 9.94A.540 as subject to a mandatory minimum sentence of total confinement shall not be released from total confinement before the completion of the listed mandatory minimum sentence for that felony crime of conviction unless allowed under RCW 9.94A.540; and(k) Any individual convicted of one or more crimes committed prior to the individual's 18th birthday may be released from confinement pursuant to RCW 9.94A.730.(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, an incarcerated individual entitled to vacation of a conviction or the recalculation of his or her offender score pursuant to State v. Blake, No. 96873-0 (Feb. 25, 2021), may be released from confinement pursuant to a court order if the incarcerated individual has already served a period of confinement that exceeds his or her new standard range. This provision does not create an independent right to release from confinement prior to resentencing.(3) Individuals residing in a juvenile correctional facility placement pursuant to RCW 72.01.410(1)(a) are not subject to the limitations in this section.Sec. 7. RCW 72.65.210 and 2023 c 470 s 2121 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The department shall establish, by rule, ((inmate))incarcerated individual eligibility standards for participation in the work release program.(2) The department shall:(a) Conduct an annual examination of each work release facility and its security procedures;(b) Investigate and set standards for the ((inmate))individual supervision policies of each work release facility;(c) Establish physical standards for future work release structures to ensure the safety of ((inmates))individuals, employees, and the surrounding communities;(d) Evaluate its recordkeeping of serious infractions to determine if infractions are properly and consistently assessed against ((inmates))individuals eligible for work release;(e) Establish a written treatment plan best suited to the ((inmate's))individual's needs, cost, and the relationship of community placement and community corrections officers to a system of case management;(f) Adopt a policy to encourage businesses employing work release ((inmates))individuals to contact the appropriate work release facility whenever an ((inmate))individual is absent from his or her work schedule. The department of corrections shall provide each employer with written information and instructions on who should be called if a work release employee is absent from work or leaves the jobsite without authorization; and(g) Develop a siting policy, in conjunction with cities, counties, community groups, and the department of commerce for the establishment of additional work release facilities. Such policy shall include at least the following elements: (i) Guidelines for appropriate site selection of work-release facilities; (ii) notification requirements to local government and community groups of intent to site a work release facility; and (iii) guidelines for effective community relations by the work release program operator.The department shall comply with the requirements of this section by July 1, 1990.(3) The department may not transfer an incarcerated individual to participate in a work release program until the department has a clinically appropriate evaluation for substance use disorder. If the incarcerated individual is diagnosed to have a substance use disorder, the department shall assist the incarcerated individual in enrolling in substance use disorder treatment services at the level deemed clinically appropriate. Individuals transferred to participate in a work release program, and diagnosed with a substance use disorder, must begin receiving substance use disorder treatment services as soon as practicable after transfer to avoid any delays in treatment. Substance use disorder treatment services shall include, as deemed necessary by the evaluation, access to medication-assisted treatment and counseling programs. Upon transfer to a work release program, when clinically appropriate, individuals must be provided with access to self-administered fentanyl testing supplies and medications designed to reverse the effects of opioid overdose.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8. The changes to restrictions on the community parenting alternative and partial confinement under sections 2 through 7 of this act apply prospectively and retroactively to persons currently serving a sentence in any facility or institution either operated by the state or utilized under contract.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 9. Section 2 of this act expires January 1, 2026.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 10. Section 3 of this act takes effect January 1, 2026.--- END ---